Hawaii statutes.
§514A-13.4 Telecommunications equipment and
renewable energy devices. (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions to the
contrary in this chapter, in the declaration of any project, or in the bylaws
of any association:

(1) The board of directors of an association shall
have the authority to install or cause the installation of antennas, conduits,
chases, cables, wires, and other television signal distribution and
telecommunications equipment upon the common elements of the project; provided
that the same shall not be installed upon any limited common element without
the consent of the owner or owners of the apartment or apartments for the use
of which the limited common element is reserved; and

(2) The installation of antennas, conduits, chases,
cables, wires, and other television signal distribution and telecommunications
equipment upon the common elements by the board shall not be deemed to alter,
impair, or diminish the common interest, elements, and easements appurtenant to
each apartment or to be a structural alteration or addition to any building
different in any material respect from the plans of the project filed in
accordance with section 514A-12; provided that no such installation shall
directly affect any nonconsenting apartment owner.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision to the
contrary in this chapter, in the declaration of any project or in the bylaws of
any association:

(1) The board shall be authorized to abandon or
change the use of any television signal distribution and telecommunications
equipment due to technological or economic obsolescence or to provide an
equivalent function by different means or methods; and

(2) The abandonment or change of use of any
television signal distribution or telecommunications equipment by the board due
to technological or economic obsolescence or to provide an equivalent function
by different means or methods shall not be deemed to alter, impair, or diminish
the common interest, elements, and easements appurtenant to each apartment or
to be a structural alteration or addition to any building different in any
material respect from the plans of the project filed in accordance with section
514A-12.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary in this chapter, or any provisions in the declaration of any project
or in the bylaws of any association:

(1) The board of directors of an association shall
have the authority to install or cause the installation of, or lease or license
the common elements for the installation of solar energy devices and wind
energy devices on the common elements of the project; provided that solar or
wind energy devices shall not be installed upon any limited common element
without the consent of the owner or owners of the unit or units for which use
of the limited common element is reserved; and

(2) The installation of solar energy devices and wind
energy devices on the common elements of the project by the board shall not be
deemed to alter, impair, or diminish the common interest, common elements, or
easements appurtenant to each unit or to be a structural alteration or addition
to any building constituting a material change in the plans of the project
filed in accordance with section 514A-12; provided that the installation does
not directly affect any nonconsenting unit owner.

(d) As used in this section:

"Directly affect" means the
installation of television signal distribution and telecommunications equipment,
solar energy devices, or wind energy devices in a manner which would specially,
personally, and adversely affect an individual apartment owner in a manner not
common to the apartment owners as a whole.

"Solar
energy device" means any new identifiable facility, equipment, apparatus,
or the like which makes use of solar energy for heating, cooling, or reducing
the use of other types of energy dependent upon fossil fuel for its generation;
provided that if the equipment as it is sold to consumers cannot be used as a
solar device without incorporation with other equipment, it shall be installed
in place and ready to be operational to qualify as a "solar energy
device"; provided further that "solar energy device" shall not
include skylights or windows.

"Television signal distribution" and
"telecommunications equipment" shall be construed in their broadest
possible senses to encompass all present and future forms of communications
technology.

"Wind energy device" means any new identifiable facility, equipment,
apparatus, or the like which makes use of wind energy for producing electricity
or reducing the use of other types of energy that are dependent upon fossil
fuel for generation; provided that if the facility, equipment, apparatus, or
the like cannot be used as a wind energy device without incorporation with
other equipment, it shall be installed in place and ready to be operational to
qualify as a "wind energy device". [L 2002, c 137, §1; am L
2010, c 53, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next